Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.584

[Art. 72] Finality of proceedings, findings and sentences.

The proceedings, findings and sentences of courts martial as reviewed and approved, as required by this code, and all dismissals and discharges carried into execution under sentences by courts martial following review and approval, as required by this code, are final and conclusive. Orders publishing the proceedings of courts martial and all action taken pursuant to those proceedings are binding upon all departments, courts, agencies, and officers of the state, subject only to action upon a petition for a new trial as provided in RCW 38.38.572.

[ 1963 c 220 s 74.]